Utah statutes.
41-4-13.   Definitions.
(a) The term "person," as used in this act, means any individual, firm,
corporation, partnership, association, trustee, receiver or assignee for the
benefit of creditors.
(b)  The terms "sell," "sold," "buy," and "purchase," as used in this act,
include exchange, barter, gift, and offer or contract to sell or buy.
